Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2501.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1102(b) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1102. Sentence for murder, murder of unborn child and murder of law enforcement officer.* * *(b) Second degree.--(1) Except as provided under section 1102.1, a person who has been convicted of murder of the second degree, of second degree murder of an unborn child or of second degree murder of a law enforcement officer shall be sentenced [to a term of life imprisonment.] as follows:123456789101112131415161718192021 (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii), the person shall be sentenced to a minimum term of imprisonment of at least 35 years. (ii) Notwithstanding subparagraph (i), the person shall be sentenced to a term of life imprisonment without parole or a term of imprisonment of at least 40 years to life without parole, if the finder of fact determines beyond a reasonable doubt that the person:(A) caused the death of the victim; or(B) was an active participant in the killing of the victim.(2) Reasonable notice to the defendant of the intention of the Commonwealth to seek a sentence of life imprisonment without parole under paragraph (1) shall be provided after the conviction and before the sentencing of the defendant.(3) In determining whether to impose a sentence of life without parole in accordance with paragraph (1), the court shall consider and make findings on the record regarding the following:(i) The impact of the offense on each victim, including oral and written impact statements made or submitted by family members of the victim detailing the physical, psychological and economic effects of the crime on the victim and the victim's family. A victim statement may include comment on the sentence of the defendant.(ii) The impact of the offense on the community. (iii) The threat posed by the defendant to the safety of the public or an individual.(iv) The nature and circumstances of the offense committed by the defendant, including the level of 20260HB2501PN3386 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 planning, use of a deadly weapon, degree of violence and vulnerability of the victim.(v) The degree of the defendant's culpability.(vi) The defendant's prior criminal history, including the nature and circumstances of prior offenses and any history of violent conduct.(vii) Guidelines for sentencing and resentencing adopted by the Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing.(viii) Any other factor that the court deems relevant to the imposition of a sentence under this section.* * *(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Active participant." A defendant whose conduct was a substantial factor in bringing about the death of the victim or who aided or attempted to aid another person in the acts resulting in the victim's death. The term includes a defendant who:(1) caused or attempted to cause serious bodily injury to the victim;( 2) committed or attempted to commit an offense listed under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9799.14 (relating to sexual offenses and tier system) against the victim;(3) used or possessed a deadly weapon during the commission of the underlying felony;(4) restrained, confined, isolated or otherwise prevented the victim from escaping while another person caused the death of the victim;20260HB2501PN3386 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) directed, commanded, solicited or encouraged another person in conduct that resulted in the death of the victim;(6) planned, organized or exercised decision-making authority over the commission of the underlying felony in a manner that materially contributed to the death of the victim;(7) knowingly created a grave risk of death to the victim or another person during the commission of the underlying felony; or(8) was present at the scene of the offense and, with knowledge that deadly force was being used or was substantially likely to be used, failed to take reasonable steps to prevent the death of the victim despite having a realistic opportunity to do so."Deadly weapon." As defined in section 2301 (relating to definitions).Section 2. Sections 9714(g) and 9715(a) of Title 42 are amended to read:§ 9714. Sentences for second and subsequent offenses.* * *(g) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "crime of violence" means murder of the second degree, murder of the third degree, voluntary manslaughter, manslaughter of a law enforcement officer as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2507(c) or (d) (relating to criminal homicide of law enforcement officer), murder of the third degree involving an unborn child as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2604(c) (relating to murder of unborn child), aggravated assault of an unborn child as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2606 (relating to aggravated assault of unborn child), aggravated assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702(a)(1) or (2) 20260HB2501PN3386 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (relating to aggravated assault), assault of law enforcement officer as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702.1(a)(1) (relating to assault of law enforcement officer), use of weapons of mass destruction as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2716(b) (relating to weapons of mass destruction), terrorism as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2717(b)(2) (relating to terrorism), strangulation when the offense is graded as a felony as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2718 (relating to strangulation), trafficking of persons when the offense is graded as a felony of the first degree as provided in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3011 (relating to trafficking in individuals), rape, involuntary deviate sexual intercourse, aggravated indecent assault, incest, sexual assault, arson endangering persons or aggravated arson as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3301(a) or (a.1) (relating to arson and related offenses), ecoterrorism as classified in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3311(b)(3) (relating to ecoterrorism), kidnapping, burglary as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3502(a)(1) (relating to burglary), robbery as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(a)(1)(i), (ii) or (iii) (relating to robbery), or robbery of a motor vehicle, drug delivery resulting in death as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2506(a) (relating to drug delivery resulting in death), or criminal attempt, criminal conspiracy or criminal solicitation to commit murder or any of the offenses listed above, or an equivalent crime under the laws of this Commonwealth in effect at the time of the commission of that offense or an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction.§ 9715. Life imprisonment for homicide.(a) Mandatory life imprisonment.--Notwithstanding the provisions of section 9712 (relating to sentences for offenses committed with firearms), 9713 (relating to sentences for offenses committed on public transportation) or 9714 (relating 20260HB2501PN3386 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to sentences for second and subsequent offenses), any person convicted of murder of the second degree or murder of the third degree in this Commonwealth who has previously been convicted at any time of murder or voluntary manslaughter in this Commonwealth or of the same or substantially equivalent crime in any other jurisdiction shall be sentenced to life imprisonment, notwithstanding any other provision of this title or other statute to the contrary.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2501PN3386 - 6 - 12345678910